New York, session 2025-2026, A999.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph 1 of paragraph (a) of subdivision 22 of 2 section 1.03 of the mental hygiene law, as amended by chapter 114 of the 3 laws of 2017, is amended to read as follows: 4 (1) (i) is attributable to intellectual disability, cerebral palsy, 5 epilepsy, neurological impairment, familial dysautonomia, Prader-Willi 6 syndrome or autism; or (ii) is attributable to fetal alcohol spectrum 7 disorders (FASD) including fetal alcohol syndrome (FAS), partial fetal 8 alcohol syndrome (pFAS), and alcohol-related neurodevelopmental disorder 9 (ARND), provided, however, that for the purposes of this section, 10 persons so considered under this clause shall: 11 (A) be over the age of seven years; 12 (B) have an FASD qualifying diagnosis by a provider; 13 (C) have an onset of such condition, disorder, or syndrome prior to 14 the age of twenty-two; 15 (D) exhibit a likelihood of indefinite continuation of such condition, 16 disorder, or syndrome; and 17 (E) such diagnosis must have a substantial impact on the person's 18 ability to complete activities of daily living; 19 § 2. This act shall take effect twenty-four months after it shall have 20 become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01248-02-5